District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.17

Reconsideration of Commission orders.

Within 120 days of May 3, 2014, the Commission shall amend its rules of practice and procedure to establish rules to expedite the reconsideration of any Commission order that will be issued to decide a matter put before it pursuant to subchapter III of this chapter.

History

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 317, 61 DCR 1882